Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2923
Investment program; report; when; contents.

(1) The investment program shall prepare and electronically submit a report to the Clerk of the Legislature no later than November 1 of each year. The report shall include the following information relating to the investment program:

(a) A statement of financial position and changes in net assets;

(b) A summary of lending and investment activities for each account and eligible project;

(c) A list of each project that is financed, including the borrower, purpose, loan terms, and repayment status; and

(d) Administrative and operating costs, fees collected, and reserve balances.

(2) Each such report shall be published and made publicly available on the website for the investment program.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 23.
July 18, 2026